Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
STATE, COUNTY, AND DISTRICT FAIRS

35-65-100.3. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" means the Colorado state fair authority created by part 4 of this article.

"Board" means the board of commissioners of the authority.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1368, § 1, effective June 2.

35-65-101. Exhibits by counties - agent.

For the purpose of promoting and encouraging the organization of agricultural and mechanical fair associations in the state of Colorado, the board of county commissioners of any county in this state, for the purpose of aiding its county in making a display of the agricultural, mineral, and livestock growth and products of its county at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition held at Pueblo or at any district fair held in any district in this state, may appropriate a sum not exceeding five hundred dollars out of the county treasury for the purpose of having its county suitably represented and may appoint a suitable person as agent to take charge of the county exhibit and represent said county at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 17, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2507.

C.L.

§ 467.

CSA:

C. 65, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-1.

35-65-102. Premiums - commissioners may remit taxes.

The boards of county commissioners in this state, for the purpose of encouraging their respective counties in making a suitable display at any fair held in their counties, may offer special premiums for the best display of the products of the soil, the different grades of thoroughbred stock, fruits of all kinds, dairy products, or whatever else is calculated to encourage and promote agricultural pursuits. The boards of county commissioners are authorized to remit the taxes for state and county purposes and the municipal authorities of any city or town to remit the municipal taxes on the property, real and personal, of any agricultural and mechanical fair associations duly organized under the laws of the state of Colorado when said property is actually and exclusively employed for the use and purposes of said fair associations within their respective counties, cities, or towns.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 17, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 2508.

C.L.

§ 468.

CSA:

C. 65, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-2.

35-65-103. Displays.

All universities, colleges, local district colleges, and stations established for experimental purposes may aid and encourage in every way possible complete displays of their respective departments at the annual exhibition of the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 18, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 2509.

C.L.

§ 469.

CSA:

C. 65, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-3.

L. 65:

p. 619, § 1.

35-65-104. Annual report of commission - publications. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 18, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 2510.

C.L.

§ 470.

CSA:

C. 65, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-4

L. 64:

p. 136, § 59.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1374, § 19, effective June 2.

35-65-105. State fair and industrial exposition.

There is hereby established the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition, which shall be held annually at Pueblo, Colorado, for the display of livestock and agricultural, horticultural, industrial, mining, water conservation, tourist industry, recreational, educational, and scientific facilities, processes, and products of the state of Colorado. A display described in this subsection (1)(a) is referred to in this subsection (1) as an "industry display".

To the extent necessary, the authority may collaborate with a state agency or an affiliate or employee of a state agency on developing an industry display or to obtain industry information and technical assistance for the industry display. State agencies are encouraged to collaborate with the authority in the development of industry displays for industries in which they have expertise.

The authority may receive information from a representative of an industry described in subsection (1)(a) of this section for the purpose of developing an industry display.

The board shall establish a process for approving the industry displays to ensure that the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition displays information that conforms with subsection (1)(a) of this section and is appropriate for patrons of all ages.

The Colorado state fair shall be designated as the "Colorado state fair and industrial exposition"; except that the legal effect of any statute designating such fair as the Colorado state fair and all rights acquired and obligations incurred prior to April 15, 1965, under such name shall not be impaired by such change of name. The revisor of statutes is hereby directed to make such change in name as specified in this section.

The Colorado state fair and industrial exposition shall be under the direction and supervision of the authority.

to (6) Repealed.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 481, § 1.

C.L.

§ 477.

CSA:

C. 65, § 11.

L. 53:

p. 287, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-5.

L. 57:

p. 368, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-5.

L. 65:

p. 619, § 2.

L. 67:

p. 718, § 1.

L. 72:

p. 547, § 8.

L. 82:

(2) amended, p. 359, § 21, effective April 30.

L. 83:

(2) and (3) R&RE and (4), (5), and (6) repealed, pp. 1370, 1374, §§ 3, 19, effective June 2.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 816, § 4, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1022), ch. 91, p. 428, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For enforcement of laws by the Colorado state patrol during or in connection with the state fair and industrial exposition, see § 24-33.5-224.

35-65-106. Revolving fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 25:

pp. 193, 194, §§ 1-4.

CSA:

C. 65, § 13.

L. 53:

p.288, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-6.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1374, § 19, effective June 2.

35-65-107. Colorado state fair authority cash fund - lease and use of facilities - repeal.

The board is authorized to enter into agreements to lease any of the facilities at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition at Pueblo, Colorado, upon such terms and conditions as shall be approved by the board. The board is further authorized to sponsor any off-season event which it may approve. All moneys received by the board under this section and through any other authorized activities shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and placed in the Colorado state fair authority cash fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in said fund shall be for the use, operation, maintenance, and support of the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition, which use shall include the payment of bond obligations in accordance with the provisions of part 3 of this article and, without limitation, other obligations of the board.

Custody of all moneys in the Colorado state fair fund as of June 30, 1997, shall be transferred to the Colorado state fair authority cash fund.

The Colorado state fair authority cash fund consists of:

All moneys that may be appropriated thereto by the general assembly;

(I.5) (A) Five million dollars, which the state treasurer shall transfer from the general fund to the fund within three days after June 29, 2021.

(B) This subsection (3)(a)(I.5) is repealed, effective December 31, 2022.

(I.7) (A) Four million dollars, which the state treasurer shall transfer from the general fund to the Colorado state fair authority cash fund created in this section within three days after May 27, 2022, to provide funding for the implementation of the 2021 Colorado state fair master plan.

(B) This subsection (3)(a)(I.7) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

All other moneys that may be available to it, including the moneys received under subsection (1) of this section; and

All money credited to the fund in accordance with section 38-13-801.5 (3).

The moneys in the Colorado state fair authority cash fund shall be subject to annual appropriation and shall not be transferred to or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 399, § 1.

CSA:

C. 65, § 13(1).

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-7.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1729, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1370, § 4, effective June 2.

L. 89:

(1), IP(3)(a), and (3)(a)(II) amended and (2) R&RE, pp. 1412, 1413, §§ 1, 3, 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 816, § 5, effective June 30.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 865, § 4, effective January 22, 2009.

L. 2014:

(4) added, (HB 14-1300), ch. 184, p. 683, § 2, effective May 14.

L. 2019:

(3)(a)(III) amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 470, § 16, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(3)(a)(I.5) added, (HB 21-1262), ch. 373, p. 2469, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

IP(3)(a) amended and (3)(a)(I.7) added, (SB 22-134), ch. 261, p. 1922, § 2, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (4), effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2014, p. 683.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1300, see section 1 of chapter 184, Session Laws of Colorado 2014. For the legislative declaration in SB 22-134, see section 1 of chapter 261, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-65-107.5. Capital construction and controlled maintenance. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 156, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 817, § 6, effective June 30.

35-65-108. Warrants. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 17:

p. 482, § 3.

C.L.:

§ 479.

CSA:

C. 65, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-8.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1374, § 19, effective June 2.

35-65-109. Authorization of peace officers to preserve order and protect exhibits.

The board of directors or executive committee of any agricultural, horticultural, or stock society of this state is authorized to contract with a city, town, county, or city and county in whose jurisdiction the grounds of said society are located to provide peace officers, as provided in section 16-2.5-101, whose duty it is to preserve order within and around the grounds of said society, to protect the property within said grounds, and to eject all persons who are improperly within the grounds of said society who are guilty of disorderly conduct or who neglect or refuse to pay the fee or observe the rules prescribed by the society. Said peace officers have the same power, during the time said exhibition continues, that a sheriff has by law to keep the peace.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 23, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2517.

C.L.

§ 480.

CSA:

C. 65, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-9.

L. 64:

p. 267, § 160.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 947, § 1, effective April 28.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1621, § 33, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3288, § 666, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For management and control of the state fair and industrial exposition, see § 35-65-105; for enforcement of laws by the Colorado state patrol during or in connection with the state fair and industrial exposition, see § 24-33.5-224.

35-65-110. Penalty - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 24, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2518.

C.L.

§ 481.

CSA:

C. 65, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-10.

L. 69:

p. 367, § 1.

L. 2021:

(2) added by revision, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, pp. 3289, 3331, §§ 667, 803.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective March 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, pp. 3289, 3331.)

35-65-111. County fairgrounds.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state is authorized to lease or purchase a tract of land suitable for county fair purposes, which shall be used for that purpose, in order to encourage and promote agricultural, mechanical, industrial, and livestock industries in this state.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 232, § 1.

C.L.

§ 482.

CSA:

C. 65, § 17.

L. 49:

p. 400, § 1.

L. 53:

p. 285, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-11.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1729, § 2, effective July 1.

35-65-112. Fairground - manager - lease.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state in its discretion, after the purchase or lease and the improvement of the land for fairground purposes as provided for in section 35-65-111, may appoint some person to look after, operate, and conduct county fairs on said fairgrounds during each year; or the said board of county commissioners may in its discretion rent or lease the said fairgrounds and improvements thereon for such rental and for such term or period of time as it deems reasonable and proper to any corporation not for pecuniary profit duly organized under the laws of the state of Colorado for the purpose of conducting, operating, and holding a county fair for the promotion of all mechanical and industrial products and agricultural, horticultural, livestock, and other products and exhibits and also for the purpose of conducting races, sports, and other entertainment usually given at county fairs.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 232, § 2.

C.L.

§ 483.

CSA:

C. 65, § 18.

L. 49:

p. 400, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-12.

35-65-113. County fairgrounds - appropriation.

The board of county commissioners of each county in this state has the power each year to appropriate from the county general fund such money as may be necessary for the purpose of purchasing, leasing, and improving the fairgrounds mentioned in sections 35-65-111 and 35-65-112.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 233, § 3.

C.L.

§ 484.

CSA:

C. 65, § 19.

L. 49:

p. 401, § 3.

L. 51:

p. 299, § 13.

L. 53:

p. 285, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-13.

35-65-114. Appropriation for maintenance.

If the board of county commissioners of any county in this state elects to conduct, operate, and manage the annual fair in its county or if it elects to lease the fairgrounds and improvements thereon as provided in this article, it is authorized to appropriate from the county general fund for that purpose the amount of money necessary therefor and for the necessary improvements and repairs of said buildings and fairgrounds, and to keep the same in repair, and to pay all costs and expenses incidental to the conducting and managing for said annual fair in its county.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 233, § 4.

C.L.

§ 485.

CSA:

C. 65, § 20.

L. 49:

p. 401, § 4.

L. 51:

p. 299, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-14.

35-65-115. District and regional fairs.

The boards of county commissioners of the various counties, for the purpose of promoting and encouraging regional or district fairs in regions or districts of which their counties are a part, may use such portions of their county fair funds as may be agreed upon by the boards of county commissioners in the various counties in the region or district to establish, operate, and conduct regional fairs at a centrally located point in said district or region. No district or regional fair shall be held on any of the days of each year on which the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition is held.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 286, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 54-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-15.

35-65-116. Race meets - dates - licenses - fees.

The board is authorized to obtain a license to conduct horse race meets at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition pursuant to article 32 of title 44. For the purposes of this section, the limitations in section 44-32-512 shall not apply, and the horse race meets shall be conducted as approved by the Colorado racing commission at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition during its duration.

In lieu of obtaining a license to conduct a horse race meet, the board is authorized to contract for the conduct of horse race meets at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition with a private, nonprofit person licensed to conduct horse race meets within forty miles of the state fair grounds, subject to authorization by the Colorado racing commission pursuant to section 44-32-512. The meet and the race days of the meet conducted at the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition shall be in addition to the number of meets and race days permitted the licensee pursuant to section 44-32-603.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 621, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 54-1-16.

L. 67:

p. 434, § 1.

L. 69:

p. 1088, § 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, pp. 1371, 1374, §§ 5, 19, effective June 2.

L. 84:

(2) RC&RE, p. 945, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1238, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 324, § 20, effective October 1.